Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 2. Oil and Hazardous Substance Response Office.

Sec. 46.08.100.
Office established.

There is established in the department the oil and hazardous substance response office. The office shall include a director and employees who are specially trained in programs and technologies related to the containment and cleanup of releases or threatened releases of oil and hazardous substances.

History.

(§ 3 ch 113 SLA 1989)

Secs. 46.08.110,
46.08.120.
Response corps; response depots. [Repealed, § 28 ch 32 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 46.08.130.
Duties of the office.

The office shall be prepared to respond promptly to a discharge of oil or a hazardous substance.

The office may respond under (a) of this section to an oil or hazardous substance discharge only if

the oil discharge is a catastrophic oil discharge that constitutes an emergency under AS

46.04.080(a)

;

the discharge of oil or a hazardous substance is declared to be an emergency under AS

46.03.865

;

the governor declares the discharge an emergency under AS 26.23;

the commissioner reasonably believes that there has been a discharge of oil or a hazardous substance, or that there is a potential discharge of oil or a hazardous substance, and the discharge may qualify under (1) — (3) of this subsection; or

the commissioner reasonably believes that the discharge or potential discharge poses an imminent and substantial threat to public health or welfare or to the environment.

When the office or corps responds to an oil or hazardous substance discharge under this section, its activities shall be guided by the relevant provisions of the incident command system applicable to the type of discharge to which it is responding.

History.

(§ 3 ch 113 SLA 1989; am § 20 ch 190 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For incident command systems, see AS

46.04.200

—

46.04.210

and AS

26.23.075

and

26.23.077

.

For the “corps” referred to in subsection (c), see AS

26.23.045

.

Sec. 46.08.140.
Emergency powers and rights of property owners.

When the office has reasonable grounds to believe that a release of oil or a hazardous substance has occurred or is threatened to occur which, in the judgment of its director, presents an imminent or present danger to the health or welfare of the people of the state or would result in or is likely to result in irreversible or irreparable damage to the natural resources or environment, and it appears to be prejudicial to the interest of the people of the state to delay action until an opportunity for a hearing can be provided, state employees or members of the corps may, with permission of the director and without prior hearing, enter private property for the purpose of containment or cleanup.

The property owner affected by a response action taken under (a) of this section has the right to be heard as soon as practicable and to present proof to the office that the containment or cleanup action is unnecessary or that it is not necessary to enter the person’s property for the containment or cleanup action.

History.

(§ 3 ch 113 SLA 1989)

Administrative Code. —

For discharge reporting, cleanup, and disposal of oil and other hazardous substances, see 18 AAC 75, art. 3.

Cross references. —

For the “corps” referred to in subsection (a), see AS

26.23.045

.

Sec. 46.08.150.
Contracts.

The department may enter into agreements with agencies of the state and federal government, political subdivisions, the University of Alaska, or private persons or entities to conduct research into oil and hazardous substances spill technology.

History.

(§ 3 ch 113 SLA 1989; am § 21 ch 190 SLA 1990; am § 24 ch 32 SLA 1994; am § 99 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Sec. 46.08.160.
Limitation of liability.

The state, an employee of the state, and a member of the corps are not liable for costs or damages as a result of actions taken under AS

46.08.100

—

46.08.190

in response to a release or threatened release unless the actions taken by the state, the employee, or the member of the corps constitute gross negligence or intentional misconduct.

History.

(§ 3 ch 113 SLA 1989)

Cross references. —

For the “corps” referred to in this section, see AS 23.26.045.

Sec. 46.08.190.
Definition of “office” for AS 46.08.100 — 46.08.190.

In AS

46.08.100

—

46.08.190

, “office” means the oil and hazardous substance response office.

History.

(§ 3 ch 113 SLA 1989; am § 22 ch 190 SLA 1990; am § 28 ch 32 SLA 1994)